South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3971.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 17 Cash Payments Section 1-1-1110.  (A) An establishment that holds a retail license to do business in this State and has an individual accepting payment in person must accept cash payments for transactions up to two thousand dollars. (B) This section does not apply to automated services or online transactions. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----